Utah statutes.
77-3-5.   Defendant taken before different magistrate -- Procedure.

When the person arrested is taken before a magistrate other than the one who issued the warrant, the peace officer who executed the warrant shall deliver it to the issuing magistrate with his endorsed return. The complaint and written testimony, if any, on which the warrant was issued shall be sent to the magistrate before whom the person arrested is taken.

